Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1617
Enlargement, defined.

Enlargement means any change in or addition to an existing dam which raises or may raise the normal storage elevation of the water impounded by the dam.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 17.